Florida, session 2026, SB616.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Florida: 26 27 Section 1.âSection 321.51, Florida Statutes, is created to 28 read: 29 321.51âUse of body cameras required.â 30 (1)âAs used in this section, the term: 31 (a)ââBody cameraâ means a portable electronic recording 32 device that is worn on an officerâs person and which records 33 audio and video data in the course of the officer performing his 34 or her official duties and responsibilities. 35 (b)ââDepartmentâ means the Department of Highway Safety and 36 Motor Vehicles. 37 (c)ââOfficerâ means a member of the Florida Highway Patrol. 38 (2)âEach officer shall wear a functioning body camera while 39 on duty and engaged in an official law enforcement-related 40 activity or public interaction. The camera must remain activated 41 during law enforcement encounters, traffic stops, pursuits, and 42 arrests and any situation in which the officerâs actions could 43 become the subject of an investigation or complaint. 44 (3)âThe department shall: 45 (a)âAdopt written policies and procedures governing the 46 proper use, activation, deactivation, maintenance, and storage 47 of body cameras. 48 (b)âEnsure compliance with the public records and retention 49 requirements of s. 119.071(2)(l). 50 (c)âProvide training to all officers on the appropriate use 51 of body cameras, and legal considerations related thereto. 52 (4)âThe department may contract with a third-party vendor 53 to provide secure cloud-based data storage for body camera 54 recordings which is consistent with the stateâs cybersecurity 55 standards. 56 (5)âAn officer who does not comply with the requirements of 57 this section or with the policies and procedures of the 58 department relating to body camera use may be subject to 59 disciplinary action. 60 (6)âChapter 934 does not apply to body camera recordings 61 made by officers wearing body cameras in accordance with this 62 section. 63 Section 2.âParagraphs (b) and (c) of subsection (1) of 64 section 943.1718, Florida Statutes, are amended to read: 65 943.1718âBody cameras; policies and procedures.â 66 (1)âAs used in this section, the term: 67 (b)ââLaw enforcement agencyâ means an agency that has a 68 primary mission of preventing and detecting crime and enforcing 69 the penal, criminal, traffic, and motor vehicle laws of the 70 state and in furtherance of that primary mission employs law 71 enforcement officers as defined in s. 943.10, except that the 72 term does not include the Florida Highway Patrol. 73 (c)ââLaw enforcement officerâ has the same meaning as 74 provided in s. 943.10, except that the term does not include a 75 member of the Florida Highway Patrol. 76 Section 3.âFor the 2026-2027 fiscal year, the nonrecurring 77 sum of $2 million is appropriated from the General Revenue Fund 78 to the Department of Highway Safety and Motor Vehicles to 79 implement this act. The funds must be used for the purchase, 80 maintenance, and storage of body cameras; to provide officer 81 training; and to provide secure, cloud-based data storage for 82 body camera recordings. 83 Section 4.âThis act shall take effect July 1, 2026.